Maryland, session 2025, SB0455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–303.
(a) The following entities may apply for the appointment of special police officers
for the following purposes:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0455*

SENATE BILL 455
(1) a municipal corporation, county, or other governmental body of the
State, in order to protect property owned, leased, or regularly used by the governmental
body or any of its units;
(2) another state, or subdivision or unit of another state, that has an
interest in property located wholly or partly in this State, in order to protect the property;
(3) a college, university, or public school system in the State, in order to
protect its property or students; [or]
(4) a person that exists and functions for a legal business purpose, in order
to protect its business property; OR
(5) A PERSON THAT HOLDS A VALID LICENSE AS A SECURITY GUARD
AGENCY UNDER TITLE 19, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND
PROFESSIONS ARTICLE, IN ORDER TO PROTECT PROPERTY OWNED OR LEASED BY
ITS CLIENTS.
(b) The applicant for a commission shall be at least 18 years old.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to an applicant for an initial commission
who, within 5 years prior to application, has:
(i) completed a basic training course for police officers approved by
the Secretary in consultation with the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission;
(ii) completed a basic training course for police officers similar to the
course described in item (i) of this paragraph in another state or for the federal government;
(iii) separated from a law enforcement agency in good standing; or
(iv) completed training approved by the Maryland Police Training
and Standards Commission for a special police officer at a State institution of higher
education.
(2) An applicant for an initial commission shall complete a training course
approved by the Secretary in consultation with the Maryland Police Training and
Standards Commission consisting of at least 80 hours of instruction, including instruction
on:
(i) criminal law;
(ii) constitutional procedural requirements relating to search,
seizure, and arrest; and

SENATE BILL 455 3
(iii) the appropriate use of force.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.